Utah statutes.
49-17-401.   Eligibility for an allowance -- Date of retirement -- Qualifications.

(1)  A member is qualified to receive an allowance when:

(a)  the member ceases actual work for a participating employer in this system before the member's retirement date and provides evidence of the termination;

(b)  the member has submitted to the office a notarized retirement application form that states the member's proposed retirement date; and

(c)  one of the following conditions is met as of the member's retirement date:

(i)  the member has accrued at least six years of service credit and has attained an age of 70 years;

(ii)  the member has accrued at least 10 years of service credit and has attained an age of 62 years;

(iii)  the member has accrued at least 20 years of service credit and has attained an age of 55 years; or

(iv)  the member has accrued at least 25 years of service credit.

(2) (a)  The member's retirement date:

(i)  shall be the 1st or the 16th day of the month, as selected by the member;

(ii)  shall be on or after the date of termination; and

(iii)  may not be more than 90 days before or after the date the application is received by the office.

(b)  A member may not be employed by a participating employer in the system established by this chapter on the retirement date selected under Subsection (2)(a)(i).

